Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.110

Discipline of registrant—Board's power—Unprofessional conduct—Reissuance of certificate of registration.

The board shall have the exclusive power to discipline the registrant and sanction the certificate of registration of any registrant.

Any person may file a complaint alleging unprofessional conduct, as set out in RCW 18.43.105, against any registrant. The complaint shall be in writing and shall be sworn to in writing by the person making the allegation. A registrant against whom a complaint was made must be immediately informed of such complaint by the board.

The board, for reasons it deems sufficient, may reissue a certificate of registration to any person whose certificate has been revoked or suspended, providing a majority of the board vote in favor of such issuance. A new certificate of registration to replace any certificate revoked, lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued, subject to the rules of the board, and a charge determined by the board shall be made for such issuance.

In addition to the imposition of disciplinary action under RCW 18.235.110 and 18.43.105, the board may refer violations of this chapter to the appropriate prosecuting attorney for charges under RCW 18.43.120.

[ 2019 c 442 s 13; 2002 c 86 s 226; 1997 c 247 s 3; 1989 c 175 s 62; 1986 c 102 s 3; 1985 c 7 s 45; 1982 c 37 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 49; 1947 c 283 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8306-31. Prior: 1935 c 167 s 11; RRS s 8306-11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.